Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Meetings and Action of the Board.

§79-4-8.20.
Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.20, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to committees of board of directors and their members, see § 79-4-8.25.

Deadlock among directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1274, 1275.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1108 et seq.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 826.

§79-4-8.21.
Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. to be taken by the board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director signs a consent describing the action taken and delivers it to the corporation.

Action taken under this section is the act of the board of directors when one or more consents signed by all the directors are delivered to the corporation. The consent may specify the time at which the action taken thereunder is to be effective. A consent may be withdrawn by a revocation signed by the director and received by the corporation prior to receipt by the corporation of unrevoked written consents signed by all the directors.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of action taken at a meeting of the board of directors and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.21; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); and substituted “action taken at a meeting of the board of directors” for “a meeting vote” in (c).

Applicability of this section to committees of board of directors and their members, see § 79-4-8.25.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

One member of the board of directors of a corporation did not have authority to hire an attorney and pay for his services from corporate funds where the record contained no documentation of a determination or resolution that an action be filed on behalf of the corporation, whether in the form of minutes from a directors’ meeting or written consents signed by the members of the board. Wyssbrod v. Wittjen, 798 So. 2d 352, 2001 Miss. LEXIS 23 (Miss. 2001).

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1256-1260.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1114, 74:1117.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 825.

§79-4-8.22.
Notice of meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two (2) days’ notice of the date, time and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.22, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to committees of board of directors and their members, see § 79-4-8.25.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1262 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1521 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 827.

§79-4-8.23.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., the articles of incorporation or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b), the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to him of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.23, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1267-1269.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1110-74:1112, 74:1122 (attendance by directors as waiver of notice of meeting), 74:1525-74:1527.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 827.

§79-4-8.24.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number or unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

A majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed, the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than one-third (1/3) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under subsection (a).

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless: (1) the director objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting; (2) the dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or (3) the director delivers written notice of the director’s dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.24; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 19, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “the director” for “he” in (d)(1) and (3); and made minor stylistic changes.

Applicability of this section to committees of board of directors and their members, see § 79-4-8.25.

Deadlock among directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

Construction, application, and effect of constitutional provisions or statutes relating to cumulative voting of stock for corporate directors. 43 A.L.R.2d 1322.

Liability of corporate director, officer, or employee for tortious interference with corporation’s contract with another.
72 A.L.R.4th 492.

Validity, construction, and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring supermajority vote. 80 A.L.R.4th 667.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1278 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 801, 834, 835.

§79-4-8.25.
Committees.

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more members of the board of directors to serve on any such committee.

Unless this chapter otherwise provides, the creation of a committee and appointment of members to it must be approved by the greater of (1) a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken or (2) the number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under Section 79-4-8.24.

Sections 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.24 apply both to committees of the board and their members.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the powers of the board of directors under Section 79-4-8.01.

A committee may not, however:

Authorize or approve distributions, except according to a formula or method or within limits prescribed by the board of directors;

Approve or propose to shareholders action that Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. requires to be approved by shareholders;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors, or subject to subsection (g), on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend or repeal bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in Section 79-4-8.30.

The board of directors may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member during the member’s absence or disqualification. Unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws or the resolution creating the committee provide otherwise, in the event of the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, unanimously, may appoint another director to act in place of the absent or disqualified member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.25; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), inserted “this chapter” following “unless,” inserted “the” preceding “bylaws,” inserted “one or more” preceding “members,” and deleted the last sentence; in the first sentence of (b), inserted “Unless this chapter otherwise provides”; rewrote (c); substituted “powers” for “authority” in (d); in (e), rewrote (1) and (3), deleted former (4) and redesignated former (5) as present (4), and deleted (6), (7), and (8); and added (g).

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-255 through 79-11-265.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1310 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1100-74:1102.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 847.

§79-4-8.26.
Submission of matters for shareholder vote.

A corporation may agree to submit a matter to a vote of its shareholders even if, after approving the matter, the board of directors determines it no longer recommends the matter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 20, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.